test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-apostwl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - apostõl: # Noun 235 'eng /est apostel/fin' - full paradigm
     apostõl+N+Sg+Nom: apostõl
     apostõl+N+Sg+Gen: apostõl
     apostõl+N+Sg+Par: apostõlt
     apostõl+N+Sg+Dat: apostõlõn
     apostõl+N+Sg+Ins: apostõlõks
     apostõl+N+Sg+Ill: apostõlõ
     apostõl+N+Sg+Ela: apostõlõst
     apostõl+N+Pl+Nom: apostõld
     apostõl+N+Pl+Gen: apostõld
     apostõl+N+Pl+Par: apostiļi
     apostõl+N+Pl+Dat: apostõldõn
     apostõl+N+Pl+Ins: apostõldõks
     apostõl+N+Pl+Ill: apostiļiž
     apostõl+N+Pl+Ela: apostiļist
